Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 6.
The Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders.

§ 53.1-176.1. Enactment of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders.

WHEREAS, the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Parolees and Probationers was established in 1937 and is the earliest corrections "compact" established among the states and has not been amended since its adoption more than 65 years ago; and

WHEREAS, that Compact is the only vehicle for the controlled movement of adult parolees and probationers across state lines, and it currently has jurisdiction over more than a quarter of a million offenders; and

WHEREAS, the complexities of that Compact have become more difficult to administer, and many jurisdictions have expanded supervision expectations to include currently unregulated practices such as victim input, victim notification requirements and sex offender registration; and

WHEREAS, after hearings, national surveys, and a detailed study by a task force appointed by the National Institute of Corrections, the overwhelming recommendation has been to amend the document to bring about an effective management capacity that addresses public safety concerns and offender accountability; and

WHEREAS, upon the adoption of this Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, it is the intention of the General Assembly to repeal the previous interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers on the effective date of this Compact; now, therefore,

The General Assembly enacts the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders as set out in §

53.1-176.2

.

(2004, c. 407.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2004, c. 407, cl. 2, provides: "That

§§

53.1-166

and

53.1-167

of the Code of Virginia shall govern the covered interactions between the Commonwealth and those jurisdictions who have not ratified the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders as set out in

§

53.1-176.2

."

Acts 2004, c. 407, cl. 3, provides: "That the provisions of this act shall become effective on the later of July 1, 2004, or upon enactment of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders, in substantially the form set out in

§

53.1-176.2

of this act, by no less than 35 states, as provided in

§

53.1-176.2

. In making a determination that this act has come into effect, the Governor may rely on the written representation of the National Institute of Corrections of the United States Department of Justice." As of July 1, 2004, the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Adult Offenders had been enacted by 35 states.